Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1311.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9778. Animal abuse registry.(a) Maintenance and posting.--Beginning January 1, 2027, the Pennsylvania State Police shall maintain and post a registry on a publicly accessible Internet website that includes individuals convicted on or after the effective date of this subsection of an animal abuse offense.(b) Regulations.--The Pennsylvania State Police may issue rules and promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section.(c) Identifying registry information.--(1) The registry shall include a photograph taken of the 123456789101112131415161718 individual convicted of an animal abuse offense as part of the booking process, the individual's full legal name and other identifying data as the Pennsylvania State Police determines necessary to properly identify the individual and to exclude innocent individuals.(2) The registry shall not include the individual's Social Security number, driver's license number or any other Federal or State identification number.(d) Judgment.--A clerk of court shall forward a copy of the judgment and date of birth of an individual convicted of an animal abuse offense to the Pennsylvania State Police within 60 calendar days of the date of the judgment.(e) Conviction and expungement.--(1) After an individual's first conviction of an animal abuse offense, the Pennsylvania State Police shall maintain the individual's name and other identifying information, as described under subsection (c), on the registry for two years following the date of conviction, after which time the Pennsylvania State Police shall remove the individual's name and identifying information from the registry if the individual is not convicted of another animal abuse offense during that two-year period.(2) Except if ordered for longer under paragraph (3), after an individual's subsequent conviction of an animal abuse offense, the Pennsylvania State Police shall maintain the individual's name and other identifying information, as described under subsection (c), on the registry for five years following the date of the most recent conviction, after which time the Pennsylvania State Police shall remove the individual's name and identifying information from the 20260SB1311PN1650 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registry if the individual is not convicted of another animal abuse offense during that five-year period.(3) In a judge's discretion, based on the severity of the animal abuse offense, the judge may order any of the following:(i) That the individual remain on the registry for longer than five years.(ii) A lifetime ban on the ownership of an animal.(f) Expungement.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall remove an individual's name and identifying information from the registry if the offense for which the individual is included on the registry is expunged.(g) Mandatory registry verification prior to sale, transfer or adoption.--(1) Prior to the sale, transfer or adoption in this Commonwealth of any live animal, the person selling or offering an animal for transfer or adoption shall verify that the prospective owner is not listed on the registry.(2) If the prospective owner appears on the registry, the person may not sell, transfer or allow for the adoption of the animal to the individual appearing on the registry.(3) Prior to the completion of a sale, transfer or adoption of an animal, the person selling, transferring or completing an adoption to a prospective owner and the prospective owner shall sign a document attesting that the registry was consulted.(4) A person who sells, transfers or completes an adoption to a prospective owner appearing on the registry, or who fails to consult the registry before the sale, transfer or adoption, commits a summary offense and, upon conviction, 20260SB1311PN1650 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be sentenced as follows:(i) For a first offense, a fine of not less than $500 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.(ii) For a second offense, a fine of not less than $1,000 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.(iii) For a third or subsequent offense, a permanent revocation of a kennel license, dealer license or out-of-State dealer license issued under the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, and a fine of not less than $1,000 or imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both.(5) For purposes of this subsection, the transfer or adoption of an animal includes whether or not a fee is charged for the transfer or adoption.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Animal abuse offense." An offense described under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5534 (relating to aggravated cruelty to animal)."Conviction." A judgment entered by a court upon a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere or a finding of guilt by a jury or the court, notwithstanding any pending appeal or habeas corpus proceeding arising from the judgment."Registry." The registry maintained and posted by the Pennsylvania State Police under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1311PN1650 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627